Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5498SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2222 Section 1. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, include 3 clinical experiences and preparation to prepare students 4 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program to 5 serve students with disabilities and English learners that 6 incorporates knowledge, skills, and dispositions for each 7 student admitted to an approved practitioner preparation 8 program. 9 (2) The rules adopted by the state board pursuant to this 10 paragraph must prescribe practicum and clinical experience 11 standards for all higher education institutions providing 12 practitioner preparation related to serving students with 13 disabilities and English learners, differentiated by standards 14 that are applicable to all students admitted to an approved 15 practitioner preparation program in addition to standards that 16 are applicable to students who are seeking an endorsement in 17 special education or English learner instruction. 18 (a) Clinical experiences for all students admitted to 19 an approved practitioner preparation program must include a 20 minimum of fifteen practicum hours focused on differentiation 21 of instruction and support for special populations, including 22 supporting English learners, special education experiences, and 23 instructional implementation and progress monitoring applicable 24 to individualized education programs. 25 (b) Clinical experiences for students admitted to an 26 approved practitioner preparation program who are seeking 27 an endorsement in English learner instruction must include 28 a minimum of forty practicum hours, inclusive of methods of 29 teaching English to English learners in both elementary and 30 secondary school settings. 31 (3) The department shall establish a process to routinely 32 review and provide ongoing support for the adoption and 33 implementation of standards for preparation of teacher and 34 administrator candidates in serving students with disabilities 35 -1- LSB 5498SV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 2222 and English learners. 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . q. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, administer 2 prior to a studentâs completion of the practitioner preparation 3 program, and require that each student complete, a summative 4 end-of-program assessment that is designed to measure the 5 studentâs preparation in content areas that are required for 6 the endorsement area in which the student will be teaching, 7 and that was distributed to the higher education institution 8 providing practitioner preparation by the department pursuant 9 to subparagraph (2). A higher education institution providing 10 practitioner preparation shall identify appropriate student 11 remediation opportunities in endorsement areas by analyzing 12 student performance on the summative end-of-program assessment 13 described in this subparagraph compared to the score set by the 14 department pursuant to subparagraph (2). 15 (2) (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall 16 identify and distribute to all higher education institutions 17 providing practitioner preparation a unified, valid, and 18 reliable summative end-of-program assessment required for each 19 endorsement area. The department shall set the minimum score 20 for each summative end-of-program assessment identified and 21 distributed pursuant to this subparagraph subdivision that will 22 be used to determine mastery of content by a student enrolled 23 in the practitioner preparation program. 24 (b) If, subsequent to July 1, 2027, the department creates 25 a new endorsement area, then the department shall identify 26 and distribute to all higher education institutions providing 27 practitioner preparation a unified, valid, and reliable 28 summative end-of-program assessment required for the new 29 endorsement area as soon as is reasonably possible after the 30 creation of the new endorsement area. The department shall set 31 the minimum score for each summative end-of-program assessment 32 identified and distributed pursuant to this subparagraph 33 subdivision that will be used to determine mastery of content 34 by a student enrolled in the practitioner preparation program. 35 -2- LSB 5498SV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 2222 (3) (a) Report to the department, in the form and manner 1 prescribed by the department, information related to the scores 2 attained by students on the summative end-of-program assessment 3 administered pursuant to subparagraph (1). 4 (b) Beginning August 1, 2028, the department shall publish 5 on the departmentâs internet site all of the following: 6 (i) Program-level data related to the passage rates 7 attained by students on the summative end-of-program assessment 8 administered pursuant to subparagraph (1). 9 (ii) Efforts the department has made to support the higher 10 education institutions providing practitioner preparation in 11 the implementation of curriculum improvements, remediation 12 techniques, and program evaluation. 13 (iii) Examples of program remediation and assessment plans 14 that higher education institutions providing practitioner 15 preparation have provided to students who scored below the 16 minimum score set by the department pursuant to subparagraph 17 (2) prior to the studentâs completion of the practitioner 18 preparation program. 19 Sec. 2. Section 256.16, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. For purposes of this section, âEnglish 22 learnerâ means the same as defined in section 280.4. 23 Sec. 3. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 26 that require an individual who has applied to a school to 27 teach in a special education setting to complete a self-paced 28 course created by the department of education as a condition 29 of awarding the individual a class B license or a conditional 30 license. The self-paced course must include content related to 31 basic special education laws, assessment procedures, and other 32 essential competencies. 33